Washington statutes.
RCW 18.215.050

Required applicant information.

An applicant shall identify the name and address of the applicant and other information required by the secretary necessary to establish whether there are grounds for denial of a registration or conditional registration under chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 1999 c 335 s 6.]